Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 4
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

14-13-401. Application and construction.

In applying and construing this article, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1537, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-402. Severability clause.

If any provision of this article or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this article that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1537, § 1, effective July 1.

14-13-403. Transitional provision.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child-custody proceeding or to enforce a child-custody determination that was commenced before July 1, 2000, is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1537, § 1, effective July 1.